California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(2) (A) A licensed retailer providing medicinal cannabis or medicinal cannabis products pursuant to this section to a qualified patient, as defined under Section 11362.7 of the Health and Safety Code, that possesses a valid physician’s recommendation, shall ensure that the physician is in good standing by following the procedures described in subparagraph (B) before providing the qualified patient with any medicinal cannabis or medicinal cannabis products that a cultivator certified were for donation pursuant to Section 34012.1 of the Revenue and Taxation Code or that are exempt from the use tax pursuant to Section 6414 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(B) In order to verify the physician’s recommendation, the licensed retailer shall do all of the
 following:

(i) Verify with the Medical Board of California, the Osteopathic Medical Board of California, and the California Board of Podiatric Medicine that the attending physician has a license in good standing to practice medicine or osteopathy in the state.

(ii) Keep a copy of the patient’s or primary caregiver’s driver’s license or other government issued identification.

(3) Except as provided for under Section 34012.1 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, the cannabis or cannabis products comply with all applicable requirements for cultivation, manufacture, distribution, processing, storing, laboratory testing, packaging, labeling, transportation, delivery, or donation under this division.

(4) A licensee intending to donate the cannabis or cannabis products shall designate the cannabis or cannabis products for donation in the track and trace system.
 If a cultivator certified that the cannabis or cannabis products are designated for donation to medicinal cannabis patients pursuant to Section 34012.1 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, a licensee shall not change that designation pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 34012.1 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(5) Before being provided to the patient or primary caregiver, the cannabis or cannabis products have been properly recorded in the track and trace system as belonging to the retailer.

(6) The cannabis or cannabis products provided to a medicinal cannabis patient or the primary caregiver of the patient in a single day shall not exceed the possession limits prescribed by Section 11362.77 of the Health and Safety Code.

(7) The event shall be properly recorded in the retailer’s inventory records and the track and trace system. The retailer shall include in its inventory records for each medicinal cannabis patient the number of an identification card issued pursuant to Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 11362.7) of Chapter 6 of Division 10 of the Health and Safety Code or a copy of the physician’s recommendation for no less than four years. If the medicinal cannabis patient is a qualified patient, as defined under Section 11362.7 of the Health and Safety Code, that possesses a valid physician’s recommendation, the retailer shall certify in writing that they verified the recommendation pursuant to paragraph (2) and shall keep a copy of that certification for no less than seven years.

(8) A
 licensed retailer that donates medicinal cannabis or medicinal cannabis products shall note the donation in their sales invoice or receipt pursuant to Section 26161 of the Business and Professions Code.

(b) In addition to the provision of free cannabis or cannabis products in subdivision (a), a licensee that is authorized to make retail sales may donate cannabis or cannabis products and the use of equipment in compliance with any compassionate use, equity, or other similar program administered by a local jurisdiction.

(c) A licensee
 that is authorized to make retail sales may contract with an individual or organization to coordinate the provision of free medicinal cannabis or medicinal cannabis products on the retailer’s premises. Licensed retailers that are solely authorized to engage in retail sales by means of delivery may provide free medicinal cannabis or medicinal cannabis products by means of delivery.

(d) This section shall become operative upon completion of the necessary changes to the track and trace program in order to implement the act adding this section, as determined by the Department of Food and Agriculture, or on March 1, 2020, whichever occurs first.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 837, Sec. 4.   (SB 34)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 8. Distribution and Transport [26080. - 26080.]

26080.

(a) Except as provided in this section and in Chapter 25 (commencing with Section 26300), this division does not authorize or permit a licensee to transport or distribute, or cause to be transported or distributed, cannabis or cannabis products outside the state.

(b) A local jurisdiction shall not prevent transportation of cannabis or cannabis products on public roads by a licensee transporting cannabis or cannabis products in compliance with this division.

(c) This division does not prohibit industrial hemp or cannabis products derived exclusively from industrial hemp from either of the following:

(1) Being continuously transported through California without entering the licensed market, provided they are not sold in California.

(2) Being shipped out of California by a licensee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 248, Sec. 18.   (AB 8)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Note: This section was added on Nov. 8, 2016, by initiative Prop. 64.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 9. Delivery [26090. - 26090.]

26090.

(a) Deliveries, as defined in this division, may only be made by a licensed retailer or microbusiness, or a licensed nonprofit under Section 26070.5.

(b) All employees of a retailer, microbusiness, or nonprofit delivering cannabis or cannabis products shall carry a copy of the licensee’s current license and a government-issued identification with a photo of the employee, such as a driver’s license. The employee shall present that license and identification upon request to state and local law enforcement, employees of the department and other state and local agencies enforcing this division.

(c) Before cannabis or a
 cannabis product leaves the licensed premises in a delivery vehicle, the retailer shall enter into the track and trace system all information required by the department and shall update the information as required by the department.

(d) During delivery, the licensee shall maintain a copy of the delivery request and shall make it available upon request of the department and law enforcement officers. The delivery request documentation shall comply with state and federal law regarding the protection of confidential medical information.

(e) A customer requesting delivery shall maintain a physical or electronic copy of the delivery request and shall make it available upon request by the department and law enforcement officers.

(f) A local jurisdiction shall not prevent delivery of cannabis or cannabis products on public roads by a licensee acting in compliance with this division and local law as adopted under Section 26200.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 56, Sec. 6.   (AB 195)   Effective June 30, 2022.   Note: This section was added on Nov. 8, 2016, by initiative Prop. 64.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 10. Testing Laboratories [26100. - 26104.]

26100.

(a) Except as otherwise provided by law, cannabis, industrial hemp, or cannabis products shall not be sold pursuant to a license provided for under this division unless a representative sample of the cannabis, industrial hemp, or cannabis products has been tested by a licensed testing laboratory.

(b) Upon entry into the licensed market, industrial hemp shall be held in quarantine by the distributor and tested by a licensed testing laboratory to confirm it meets the definition of industrial hemp contained in Section 26001 before transfer to another licensee or incorporation into a cannabis product. Quarantined plant material that is determined not to be industrial hemp shall be destroyed.

(c) The department shall develop criteria to determine which batches shall be tested. All testing of the samples shall be performed on the final form in which the cannabis or cannabis product will be consumed or used,
 unless otherwise specified in this division.

(d) Testing of batches to meet the requirements of this division shall only be conducted by a licensed testing laboratory.

(e) For each batch tested, the testing laboratory shall issue a certificate of analysis for selected lots at a frequency determined by the department with supporting data, to report both of the following:

(1) Whether the chemical profile of the sample conforms to the labeled content of compounds, including, but not limited to, all of the following, unless limited through regulation by the department:

(A) Tetrahydrocannabinol (THC).

(B) Tetrahydrocannabinolic Acid (THCA).

(C) Cannabidiol (CBD).

(D) Cannabidiolic Acid (CBDA).

(E) The terpenes required by the department in regulation.

(F) Cannabigerol (CBG).

(G) Cannabinol (CBN).

(H) Other compounds or contaminants required by the department.

(2) That the presence of contaminants does not exceed the levels established by the department. In establishing the levels, the department shall consider the American Herbal Pharmacopoeia monograph,
 guidelines set by the Department of Pesticide Regulation pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 26060, and any other relevant sources. For purposes of this paragraph, “contaminants” includes, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(A) Residual solvent or processing chemicals.

(B) Foreign material, including, but not limited to, hair, insects, or similar or related adulterant.

(C) Microbiological impurities as identified by the department in regulation.

(3) For edible cannabis products, that the milligrams per serving of THC does not exceed 10 milligrams per serving, plus or minus 12 percent. After January 1, 2022, the milligrams of THC per serving shall
 not deviate from 10 milligrams by more than 10 percent.

(4) Notwithstanding paragraph (3), the department shall establish regulations to adjust testing variances for edible cannabis products that include less than five milligrams of THC in total.

(f) A testing laboratory may amend a certificate of analysis to correct minor errors, as defined by the department.

(g) (1) Standards for residual levels of volatile organic compounds shall be established by the department.

(2) On or before January 1, 2023, the department shall establish a standard cannabinoids test method, including standardized operating procedures, that shall be utilized by all
 testing laboratories. The department may establish more than one method for use by testing laboratories and these standards may be developed through a reference laboratory.

(h) The testing laboratory shall conduct all testing required by this section in a manner consistent with general requirements for the competence of testing and calibrations activities, including sampling and using verified methods.

(i) All testing laboratories performing tests pursuant to this section shall obtain and maintain ISO/IEC 17025 accreditation as required by the department in regulation.

(j) (1) If a test result falls outside the specifications authorized by law or regulation, the testing laboratory shall follow a
 standard operating procedure to confirm or refute the original result.

(2) If a test result falls outside the specifications authorized by law or regulation, the testing laboratory may retest the sample if both of the following occur:

(A) The testing laboratory notifies the department, in writing,
 that the test was compromised due to equipment malfunction, staff error, or other circumstances allowed by the department.

(B) The department authorizes the testing laboratory to retest the sample.

(k) A testing laboratory shall destroy the remains of the sample of cannabis, industrial hemp, or cannabis product upon completion of the analysis, as determined by the department through regulations.

(l) Presale inspection, testing transfer, or transportation of cannabis or cannabis products pursuant to this section shall conform to a specified chain of custody protocol and any other requirements imposed under this division.

 (m) This
 division does not prohibit a licensee from performing testing on the licensee’s premises for the purposes of quality control of the product in conjunction with reasonable business operations. This division also does not prohibit a licensee from performing testing on the licensee’s premises of cannabis or cannabis products obtained from another licensee. Onsite testing by the licensee shall not be certified by the department and does not exempt the licensee from the requirements of compliance testing at a testing laboratory pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 248, Sec. 19.   (AB 8)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Note: This section was added (as Section 26101) on Nov. 8, 2016, by initiative Prop. 64.)
-------------------------------------------

26102.

A testing laboratory shall not be licensed by the department unless the laboratory meets all of the following:

(a) Complies with any other requirements specified by the department.

(b) Notifies the department within one business day after the receipt of notice of any kind that its accreditation has been denied, suspended, or revoked.

(c) Has established standard operating procedures that provide for adequate chain of custody controls for samples transferred to the testing laboratory for testing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 70, Sec. 61.   (AB 141)   Effective July 12, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

26104.

(a) A licensed testing laboratory shall, in performing activities concerning cannabis and cannabis products, comply with the requirements and restrictions set forth in applicable law and regulations.

(b) The department shall develop procedures to do all of the following:

(1) Ensure that testing of cannabis and cannabis products occurs prior to distribution to retailers, microbusinesses, or nonprofits licensed under Section 26070.5.

(2) Specify how often licensees shall test cannabis and cannabis products, and that the cost of testing cannabis shall be borne by the licensed cultivators and the cost of testing cannabis products shall be borne by the licensed manufacturer, and that the costs of testing cannabis and cannabis products shall be borne by a nonprofit licensed under Section 26070.5.

(3) Require destruction of harvested batches whose testing
 samples indicate noncompliance with health and safety standards required by the department, unless remedial measures can bring the cannabis or cannabis products into compliance with quality assurance standards as specified by law and implemented by the department.

(4) Ensure that a testing laboratory employee takes the sample of cannabis or cannabis products from the distributor’s premises for testing required by this division and that the testing laboratory employee transports the sample to the testing laboratory. The driver transporting the sample pursuant to this requirement shall be directly employed by the testing laboratory.

(c) (1) Except as provided in this division, a testing laboratory shall not acquire or receive cannabis or cannabis products except from a licensee in accordance with this division, and shall not
 distribute, sell, or dispense cannabis or cannabis products, from the licensed premises from which the cannabis or cannabis products were acquired or received. All transfer or transportation shall be performed pursuant to a specified chain of custody protocol.

(2) A testing laboratory may receive and test samples of cannabis or cannabis products from a state or local law enforcement, or a prosecuting or regulatory agency in order to test the cannabis or cannabis products. For purposes of this section, testing conducted by a testing laboratory for state or local law enforcement, a prosecuting agency, or a regulatory agency is not commercial cannabis activity and shall not be arranged or overseen by the department.

(d) A testing laboratory may receive and test samples of cannabis or cannabis products from a licensed manufacturer or licensed cultivator for quality control purposes. A testing laboratory shall not certify samples from a licensed manufacturer or licensed cultivator for retail sale. All tests performed by a testing laboratory for a licensed manufacturer or licensed cultivator shall be recorded with the name of the licensee and the amount of cannabis or cannabis product received. 

(e) A testing laboratory may receive and test samples of cannabis or cannabis products from a qualified patient or primary caregiver with a valid physician’s recommendation for cannabis for medicinal purposes. A testing laboratory shall not certify samples from a qualified patient or primary caregiver for resale or transfer to another person or licensee. All tests performed by a testing laboratory for a qualified patient or primary caregiver shall be recorded with the name of the qualified patient or primary caregiver and the amount of cannabis or cannabis product received.

(f) A testing laboratory may receive and test samples of cannabis or cannabis products from a person over 21 years of age when the cannabis has been grown by that person and will be used solely for that person’s use, as authorized pursuant to Section 11362.1 of the Health and Safety Code. A testing laboratory shall not certify samples from the person over 21 years of age for resale or transfer to another person or licensee. All tests recorded pursuant to this subdivision shall be recorded with the name of the person submitting the sample and the amount of cannabis or cannabis product received.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 70, Sec. 62.   (AB 141)   Effective July 12, 2021.   Note: This section was added on Nov. 8, 2016, by initiative Prop. 64.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 11. Quality Assurance, Inspection, and Testing [26110. - 26110.]

26110.

(a) Cannabis and cannabis product batches are subject to quality assurance standards and testing prior to sale at a retailer, microbusiness, or nonprofit licensed under Section 26070.5, except for immature cannabis plants and seeds, as provided for in this division.

(b) A licensee that holds a valid distributor license may act as the distributor for the licensee’s cannabis, industrial hemp, and cannabis products.

(c) The distributor shall store, as determined by the department, the cannabis and cannabis product batches on the premises of the distributor before testing and continuously until either of the following
 occurs:

(1) The batch passes the testing requirements pursuant to this division and is transported to a licensed retailer or to another licensed distributor.

(2) The batch fails the testing requirements pursuant to this division and is destroyed or transported to a manufacturer for remediation as allowed by the department.

(d) Industrial hemp is subject to quality assurance standards and testing upon entry into the licensed market. The distributor shall store each batch of industrial hemp until either of the following occurs:

(1) The batch passes the testing requirements pursuant to this division and is transported to a licensed manufacturer or to another licensed
 distributor.

(2) The batch fails the testing requirements pursuant to this division and is destroyed.

(e) The distributor shall arrange for a testing laboratory to obtain a representative sample of each cannabis, industrial hemp, and cannabis product batch at the distributor’s licensed premises. After obtaining the sample, the testing laboratory representative shall maintain custody of the sample and transport it to the testing laboratory.

(f) Upon issuance of a certificate of analysis by the testing laboratory that the cannabis and cannabis product batch has passed the testing requirements pursuant to this division, the distributor shall conduct a quality assurance review before distribution to ensure the labeling
 and packaging of the cannabis and cannabis products conform to the requirements of this division.

(g) (1) There shall be a quality assurance compliance monitor who is an employee or contractor of the department and who shall not hold a license in any category or own or have an ownership interest in a licensee or the premises of a licensee.

(2) The quality assurance compliance monitor shall conduct random quality assurance reviews at a distributor’s licensed premises before distribution to ensure the labeling and packaging of the cannabis and cannabis products conform to the requirements of this division.

(3) The quality assurance compliance monitor shall have access to all records and test
 results required of a licensee by law in order to conduct quality assurance analysis and to confirm test results. All records of inspection and verification by the quality assurance compliance monitor shall be provided to the department. Failure to comply shall be noted by the quality assurance compliance monitor for further investigation. Violations shall be reported to the department. The quality assurance compliance monitor shall also verify the tax payments collected and paid under Sections 34011 and 34012 of the Revenue and Taxation Code are accurate. The monitor shall also have access to the inputs and assumptions in the track and trace system and shall be able to verify their accuracy and that they are commensurate with the tax payments.

(h) After testing, all cannabis and cannabis products fit for sale may be transported only from the
 distributor’s premises to the premises of another licensed distributor for further distribution, or to a licensed retailer, microbusiness, or nonprofit for retail sale.

(i) A licensee is not required to sell cannabis or cannabis products to a distributor and may directly contract for sale with a licensee authorized to sell cannabis and cannabis products to purchasers.

(j) A distributor performing services pursuant to this section may collect a fee from the licensee for the services provided. The fee may include, but is not limited to, the costs incurred for laboratory testing. A distributor may also collect applicable state or local taxes and fees.

(k) This section does not prohibit a licensee from performing testing
 on the licensee’s premises for the purposes of quality control of the product in conjunction with reasonable business operations. The testing conducted on the licensee’s premises by the licensee does not meet the testing requirements pursuant to this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 248, Sec. 20.   (AB 8)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 12. Packaging and Labeling [26120. - 26122.]

26120.

(a) Prior to delivery or sale at a retailer, cannabis and cannabis products shall be labeled and placed in a tamper-evident, child-resistant package and shall include a unique identifier for the purposes of identifying and tracking cannabis and cannabis products. If the cannabis or cannabis product contains multiple servings, the package shall also be resealable.

(b) Packages and labels shall not be made to be attractive to children.

(c) All cannabis and cannabis product labels and inserts shall include the following information prominently displayed in a clear and legible fashion in accordance with the
 requirements, including font size, prescribed by the department:

(1) The following statements, in bold print:

(A) For cannabis: “GOVERNMENT WARNING: THIS PACKAGE CONTAINS CANNABIS, A SCHEDULE I CONTROLLED SUBSTANCE. KEEP OUT OF REACH OF CHILDREN AND ANIMALS. CANNABIS MAY ONLY BE POSSESSED OR CONSUMED BY PERSONS 21 YEARS OF AGE OR OLDER UNLESS THE PERSON IS A QUALIFIED PATIENT. CANNABIS USE WHILE PREGNANT OR BREASTFEEDING MAY BE HARMFUL. CONSUMPTION OF CANNABIS IMPAIRS YOUR ABILITY TO DRIVE AND OPERATE MACHINERY. PLEASE USE EXTREME CAUTION.”

(B) For cannabis products: “GOVERNMENT WARNING: THIS PRODUCT CONTAINS CANNABIS, A SCHEDULE I CONTROLLED SUBSTANCE. KEEP OUT OF REACH OF CHILDREN AND
 ANIMALS. CANNABIS PRODUCTS MAY ONLY BE POSSESSED OR CONSUMED BY PERSONS 21 YEARS OF AGE OR OLDER UNLESS THE PERSON IS A QUALIFIED PATIENT. THE INTOXICATING EFFECTS OF CANNABIS PRODUCTS MAY BE DELAYED UP TO TWO HOURS. CANNABIS USE WHILE PREGNANT OR BREASTFEEDING MAY BE HARMFUL. CONSUMPTION OF CANNABIS PRODUCTS IMPAIRS YOUR ABILITY TO DRIVE AND OPERATE MACHINERY. PLEASE USE EXTREME CAUTION.”

(2) For packages containing only dried flower, the net weight of cannabis in the package.

(3) Identification of the type of cannabis or cannabis product and the date of packaging.

(4) The appellation of origin, if any.

(5) List of pharmacologically active
 ingredients, including, but not limited to, tetrahydrocannabinol (THC), cannabidiol (CBD), and other cannabinoid content, the THC and other cannabinoid amount in milligrams per serving, servings per package, and the THC and other cannabinoid amount in milligrams for the package total.

(6) A warning if nuts or other known allergens are used.

(7) Information associated with the unique identifier issued by the department.

(8) For a medicinal cannabis product sold at a retailer, the statement “FOR MEDICAL USE ONLY.”

(9) Any other requirement set by the department.

(d) Only generic food names may be
 used to describe the ingredients in edible cannabis products.

(e) Cannabis beverages may be packaged in containers that are clear or any color.

(f) The package and label of a cannabis cartridge and an integrated cannabis vaporizer shall not indicate that the cannabis cartridge or integrated cannabis vaporizer is disposable nor imply that it may be thrown in the trash or recycling streams.

(g) In the event the Attorney General determines that cannabis is no longer a Schedule I controlled substance under federal law, the label prescribed in subdivision (c) shall no longer require a statement that cannabis is a Schedule I controlled substance.

(h) This section
 shall become operative on July 1, 2024.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 1.5) and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 390, Sec. 2.5.   (AB 1894)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative July 1, 2024, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

26121.

(a) On or before July 1, 2025, the department shall reevaluate regulations adopted pursuant to Section 26120 to determine whether any additional warnings are necessary to reflect evolving science and shall adopt regulations for cannabis and cannabis product labels or inserts reflecting the evolving science regarding the risks that cannabis use may cause consumers.

(b) (1) On or before January 1, 2030, and every five years thereafter, the department shall reevaluate the regulations adopted pursuant to subdivision (a) to determine whether requirements imposed in those regulations reflect the state of the evolving science on cannabis health effects
 and on effective communication of health warnings.

(2) The Legislature recommends that the department, and the department may, use research funded pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 34019 of the Revenue and Taxation Code that evaluates labeling and packaging, and, in conformance with the provisions of that subdivision, the department may commission new research to assess the efficacy of the warnings required by subdivision (a) and approaches to identify future best practices for cannabis health warning labels that are most effective in changing knowledge and intent to consume or consumption. 

(c) Cannabis or cannabis products manufactured before July 1, 2025, may be sold before July 1, 2026, without meeting the labeling requirements imposed by the regulations adopted pursuant to
 subdivision (a).

(d) Cannabis or cannabis products manufactured before January 1, 2030, and every year thereafter when new labeling requirements are imposed by the regulations adopted pursuant to subdivision (a) may be sold for up to 12 months from the effective date of those regulations, or for a shorter period of time as prescribed by the department in those regulations, if they comply with the regulations in effect prior to the enactment of the new regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 491, Sec. 2.   (SB 540)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

26122.

(a) A cannabis cartridge or integrated cannabis vaporizer that contains cannabis or a cannabis product shall bear the universal symbol described in paragraph (7) of subdivision (c) of Section 26130. The universal symbol shall be visible on the cannabis cartridge or integrated cannabis vaporizer and shall not be smaller than one-quarter inch wide by one-quarter inch high. The universal symbol shall be engraved, affixed with a sticker, or printed in black or white.

(b) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Cannabis cartridge” means a cartridge containing cannabis oil that is intended to be affixed to an electronic device that heats the oil and
 creates an aerosol or vapor.

(2) “Integrated cannabis vaporizer” means a singular device that contains both cannabis oil and an integrated electronic device that creates an aerosol or vapor.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 830, Sec. 1.   (AB 1529)   Effective October 12, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 13. Manufacturers and Cannabis Products [26130. - 26132.]

26130.

(a) The department shall promulgate regulations governing the licensing of cannabis manufacturers and standards for the manufacturing, packaging, and labeling of all manufactured cannabis products. Licenses to be issued are as follows:

(1) “Manufacturing Level 1,” for sites that manufacture cannabis products using nonvolatile solvents, or no solvents.

(2) “Manufacturing Level 2,” for sites that manufacture cannabis products using volatile solvents.

(b) For purposes of this section, “volatile solvents” shall have the same meaning as in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of
 Section 11362.3 of the Health and Safety Code, unless otherwise provided by law or regulation.

(c) Edible cannabis products shall be:

(1) Not designed to be appealing to children or easily confused with commercially sold candy or foods that do not contain cannabis.

(2) Produced and sold with a standardized concentration of cannabinoids not to exceed 10 milligrams tetrahydrocannabinol (THC) per serving.

(3) Delineated or scored into standardized serving sizes if the cannabis product contains more than one serving and is an edible cannabis product in solid form.

(4) Homogenized to ensure
 uniform disbursement of cannabinoids throughout the product.

(5) Manufactured and sold under sanitation standards established by the department that are similar to the standards for preparation, storage, handling, and sale of food products.

(6) Provided to customers with sufficient information to enable the informed consumption of the product, including the potential effects of the cannabis product and directions as to how to consume the cannabis product, as necessary.

(7) Marked with a universal symbol, as determined by the department through regulation.

(d) Cannabis, including concentrated cannabis, included in a cannabis product manufactured in compliance
 with law is not considered an adulterant under state law.

(e) (1) If the cannabis product is intended for therapeutic effect or health supplementation use on, or for consumption by, an animal, the cannabis product shall also conform with any additional relevant standards, including, but not limited to, an alternative standardized concentration, established by the department through regulations.

(2) The department shall promulgate regulations for animal product standards no later than July 1, 2025. Cannabis products shall not be marketed or sold for use on, or consumption by, animals before these regulations for
 animal standards take effect.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 389, Sec. 5.   (AB 1885)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Note: This section was added on Nov. 8, 2016, by initiative Prop. 64.)
-------------------------------------------

26131.

Standards for the production, packaging, and labeling of all cannabis products developed by the department apply to all licensed manufacturers and microbusinesses, and nonprofits licensed under Section 26070.5, unless otherwise specified by the department.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 26106 by Stats. 2021, Ch. 70, Sec. 64.   (AB 141)   Effective July 12, 2021.   Note: This section was added on Nov. 8, 2016, by initiative Prop. 64.)
-------------------------------------------

26132.

Manufacturing Level 2 licensees shall enact sufficient methods or procedures to capture or otherwise limit risk of explosion, combustion, or any other unreasonably dangerous risk to public safety created by volatile solvents. The department shall establish minimum standards concerning such methods and procedures for Level 2 licensees.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 26105 by Stats. 2021, Ch. 70, Sec. 63.   (AB 141)   Effective July 12, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 14. Protection of Minors [26140. - 26140.]

26140.

(a) An A-licensee shall not:

(1) Sell cannabis or cannabis products to persons under 21 years of age.

(2) Allow any person under 21 years of age on its premises, unless the A-licensee holds an M-license and the licensed premises for the A-license and M-license are the same.

(3) Employ or retain persons under 21 years of age.

(4) Sell or transfer cannabis or cannabis products unless the person to whom the cannabis or cannabis product is to be sold first presents documentation that reasonably appears to be a valid government-issued identification card showing that the person is 21 years of age or older.

(b) Persons under 21 years of age may be used by peace officers in the enforcement of this division and to apprehend licensees, or employees or agents of licensees, or other persons who sell or furnish cannabis to minors. Notwithstanding any other law, a person under 21 years of age who purchases or attempts to purchase cannabis or cannabis products while under the direction of a peace officer is immune from prosecution for that purchase or attempt to purchase cannabis or cannabis products. Guidelines with respect to the use of persons under 21 years of age as decoys shall be adopted and published by the department in accordance with the rulemaking portion of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), an M-licensee may:

(1) Allow on the premises a person 18 years of age or older who possesses a valid government-issued identification card, and either a valid county-issued identification card under Section 11362.712 of the Health and Safety Code or a valid physician’s recommendation for themselves or for a person for whom that person is a primary caregiver.

(2) Allow a person 21 years of age or older on its premises if the M-licensee holds an A-license and the licensed premises for the M-license and A-license are the same.

(3) Sell cannabis, cannabis products, and cannabis accessories to a person 18 years of age or older who possesses a valid government-issued identification card and either a valid county-issued identification card under Section 11362.712 of the Health and Safety Code or a valid physician’s recommendation for themselves or for a person for whom the person is a primary caregiver.

(4) The department may establish requirements for the purchase of cannabis, cannabis products, or cannabis accessories by a primary caregiver for a patient to ensure that the status of a person as a primary caregiver is verified.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 70, Sec. 74.   (AB 141)   Effective July 12, 2021.   Note: This section was added on Nov. 8, 2016, by initiative Prop. 64.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 15. Advertising and Marketing Restrictions [26150. - 26156.]

26150.

For purposes of this chapter:

(a) “Advertise” means the publication or dissemination of an advertisement.

(b) “Advertisement” includes any written or verbal statement, illustration, or depiction which is calculated to induce sales of cannabis or cannabis products, including any written, printed, graphic, or other material, billboard, sign, or other outdoor display, public transit card, other periodical literature, publication, or in a radio or television broadcast, or in any other media; except that such term shall not include:

(1) Any label affixed to any cannabis or cannabis products, or any individual covering, carton, or other wrapper of that container
 that constitutes a part of the labeling under provisions of this division.

(2) Any editorial or other reading material, such as a news release, in any periodical or publication or newspaper for the publication of which no money or valuable consideration is paid or promised, directly or indirectly, by any licensee, and which is not written by or at the direction of the licensee.

(c) “Advertising sign” is any sign, poster, display, billboard, or any other stationary or permanently affixed advertisement promoting the sale of cannabis or cannabis products which are not cultivated, manufactured, distributed, or sold on the same lot.

(d) “Health-related statement” means any statement related to health, and includes statements of a curative or therapeutic nature that, expressly or by implication, suggest a relationship
 between the consumption of cannabis or cannabis products and health benefits, or effects on health.

(e) “Market” or “Marketing” means any act or process of promoting or selling cannabis or cannabis products, including, but not limited to, sponsorship of sporting events, point-of-sale advertising, and development of products specifically designed to appeal to certain demographics.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 27, Sec. 84.   (SB 94)   Effective June 27, 2017.   Note: This section was added on Nov. 8, 2016, by initiative Prop. 64.)
-------------------------------------------

26151.

(a) (1) All advertisements and marketing shall accurately and legibly identify the licensee responsible for its content, by adding, at a minimum, the licensee’s license number.

(2) A technology platform shall not display an advertisement by a licensee on an Internet Web page unless the advertisement displays the license number of the licensee.

(3) An outdoor advertising company subject to the Outdoor Advertising Act (Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 5200) of Division 3) shall not display an advertisement by a licensee unless the advertisement displays the license number of the licensee.

(b) Any advertising or
 marketing placed in broadcast, cable, radio, print, and digital communications shall only be displayed where at least 71.6 percent of the audience is reasonably expected to be 21 years of age or older, as determined by reliable, up-to-date audience composition data.

(c) Any advertising or marketing involving direct, individualized communication or dialogue controlled by the licensee shall utilize a method of age affirmation to verify that the recipient is 21 years of age or older before engaging in that communication or dialogue controlled by the licensee. For purposes of this section, that method of age affirmation may include user confirmation, birth date disclosure, or other similar registration method.

(d) All advertising shall be truthful and appropriately substantiated.
